Oklahoma, session 2025, SB597.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 104 of Title 66, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:


1. “Branch line” means a secondary railroad track that branches


off from a main line;


2. “Main line” means a Class I railroad as documented in


current timetables filed by the Class I railroad with the Federal


Railroad Administration under 49 C.F.R., Section 217.7 when the



Req. No. 119 Page 1


railroad has five million (5,000,000) or more gross tons of railroad


traffic transported annually;


3. “Railroad” means any form of non-highway ground


transportation that runs on rails or electromagnetic guideways;


4. “Train” means one or more locomotives, coupled with or


without cars, that require an air brake test in accordance with 49


C.F.R., Part 232 or 238; and


5. “Siding or passing track” means a sidetrack with switches at


both ends.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 105 of Title 66, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. No railroad company operating in this state shall run or


permit to be run any train that exceeds eight thousand five hundred


(8,500) feet in length or exceeds the length of the shortest siding


or passing track on which it travels on any main line or branch


line, or that routinely or repeatedly blocks any intersection for


periods exceeding ten (10) minutes at one time.


B. Except as provided in subsection C of this section, if any


railroad company has been determined by the Transportation


Commission as willfully violating subsection A of this section, the


company shall be liable for a civil penalty not less than Five


Hundred Dollars ($500.00) per foot nor more than One Thousand



Req. No. 119 Page 2


Dollars ($1,000.00) per foot of the length of a train exceeding the


limitation set forth in subsection A of this section.


C. Any railroad company that commits a grossly negligent


violation or that has a pattern of repeated violations, which the


Transportation Commission has determined caused an imminent threat


of death or injury to another person or that caused death or injury


to another person, shall be subject to a fine not to exceed Two


Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00).


D. In determining the amount of a civil penalty under this


section, the Transportation Commission shall consider the:


1. Nature, circumstances, extent, and seriousness of the


violation; and


2. Degree of culpability, history of violations, ability to


pay, and any effect on the violator’s ability to continue to do


business.


E. At the request of the Transportation Commission, the


Attorney General may initiate a civil action in any court of


competent jurisdiction to collect any civil penalty imposed pursuant


to this section. A civil action under this section shall be


commenced within three (3) years of the date of the violation or


within three (3) years of the latest violation if a repeated offense


is alleged.





Req. No. 119 Page 3


F. Any civil penalty received under this section shall be


deposited in the State Transportation Fund created under Section


1501.1 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-119 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:39:37 AM





































Req. No. 119 Page 4